Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2039
Temporary educational permit; application; department; duties.

Before granting any temporary educational permit, the department, with the recommendation of the board, shall ascertain that an authorized provider of graduate medical education, a fellowship, or a refresher course has requested the issuance of a temporary educational permit for an applicant to participate in its graduate medical education, fellowship, or refresher course for the period involved.

Laws 1969, c. 560, § 13, p. 2284;

Laws 1971, LB 150, § 10;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 430;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,107.07;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 336;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 697.